dist/turkspell-v0.6-dd/tr.dic
aceleleşmek/≗⊃
acıtıvermek/≗⊃
adımlayabilmek/≗⊃
aklanabilmek/≗⊃
aksırıvermek/≗⊃
alabilmek/≗⊃
alevlenmek/≗⊃
alçılayabilmek/≗⊃
alışıvermek/≗⊃
anlaşılabilmek/≗⊃
anımsatıvermek/≗⊃
arayıvermek/≗⊃
arşivlenmek/≗⊃
askerileştirilmek/≗⊃
atfedilmek/≗⊃
avlayıvermek/≗⊃
ayartılabilmek/≗⊃
ayıklayıvermek/≗⊃
azledilebilmek/≗⊃
açılabilmek/≗⊃
ağırlayabilmek/≗⊃
aşırılabilmek/≗⊃
bakışabilmek/≗⊃
barıştırabilmek/≗⊃
batıvermek/≗⊃
bağımsızlaştırabilmek/≗⊃
baş vermek/≗⊃
bebekleşmek/≗⊃
bekitmek/≗⊃
belgegeçerletmek/≗⊃
belirginleştirebilmek/≗⊃
belirsizleştirilmek/≗⊃
belleyebilmek/≗⊃
benimsetmek/≗⊃
berbat etmek/≗⊃
bertaraf etmek/≗⊃
besteleyivermek/≗⊃
bezdirilmek/≗⊃
beğenebilmek/≗⊃
biletilmek/≗⊃
bilgilenmek/≗⊃
bilinçsizleşebilmek/≗⊃
binilmek/≗⊃
biriktirilmek/≗⊃
bitimsizleştirmek/≗⊃
bitkileşmek/≗⊃
biçimlenivermek/≗⊃
bocalayabilmek/≗⊃
borçlandırabilmek/≗⊃
bozdurulabilmek/≗⊃
boğuluvermek/≗⊃
budanabilmek/≗⊃
bulaştırıvermek/≗⊃
buluşturuvermek/≗⊃
buruşabilmek/≗⊃
böceklenmek/≗⊃
börtletmek/≗⊃
bütünletmek/≗⊃
büyüyebilmek/≗⊃
bıraktırılabilmek/≗⊃
caydırılabilmek/≗⊃
celallenmek/≗⊃
cevap vermek/≗⊃
ciltletmek/≗⊃
cisimleştirmek/≗⊃
daim etmek/≗⊃
damgalayıvermek/≗⊃
daraltıvermek/≗⊃
dayatıvermek/≗⊃
dedikodu etmek/≗⊃
deldirtmek/≗⊃
delivermek/≗⊃
demleyebilmek/≗⊃
denetletmek/≗⊃
dengesizleştirilmek/≗⊃
denşirmek/≗⊃
derecelendirilebilmek/≗⊃
derlendirmek/≗⊃
despotlaşabilmek/≗⊃
devingenleşmek/≗⊃
devredilebilmek/≗⊃
değdirilebilmek/≗⊃
değersizleştirmek/≗⊃
değiştirivermek/≗⊃
didişmek/≗⊃
dikkat etmek/≗⊃
dileyebilmek/≗⊃
dincelmek/≗⊃
dinlendirmek/≗⊃
dinçleşmek/≗⊃
dirilmek/≗⊃
dizeleştirebilmek/≗⊃
dişileştirmek/≗⊃
dolanıvermek/≗⊃
doyabilmek/≗⊃
durabilmek/≗⊃
döllenmek/≗⊃
döşetilmek/≗⊃
düzenletebilmek/≗⊃
düğümleyebilmek/≗⊃
dışlanabilmek/≗⊃
edilginleşmek/≗⊃
efsaneleştirmek/≗⊃
ekletmek/≗⊃
ele gelmek/≗⊃
ellettirmek/≗⊃
emredebilmek/≗⊃
engellenmek/≗⊃
eritebilmek/≗⊃
erkeksileşmek/≗⊃
esinlenilmek/≗⊃
esnetebilmek/≗⊃
etkileşebilmek/≗⊃
evcilleşmek/≗⊃
evlenilmek/≗⊃
eyleyebilmek/≗⊃
ezivermek/≗⊃
eğitilebilmek/≗⊃
eşelenmek/≗⊃
eşmek/≗≿
feminenleşmek/≗⊃
filmleştirilmek/≗⊃
frenlenmek/≗⊃
gasbedilmek/≗⊃
geliştirilmek/≗⊃
gereksizleştirmek/≗⊃
gevezeleşmek/≗⊃
geçirilebilmek/≗⊃
girişebilmek/≗⊃
gölgeleyebilmek/≗⊃
görselleşmek/≗⊃
gözlemlenmek/≗⊃
gülümseyebilmek/≗⊃
güreştirmek/≗⊃
haczedilmek/≗⊃
hamt etmek/≗⊃
havalanabilmek/≗⊃
hicret etmek/≗⊃
hüpletmek/≗⊃
ilenmek/≗⊃
ilmek/≗≿⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝⊞⊟
incitmek/≗⊃
irkiltmek/≗⊃
iteleyebilmek/≗⊃
iç çekmek/≗⊃
işaretlenmek/≗⊃
kabullenebilmek/≗⊃
kandırabilmek/≗⊃
kartelleşmek/≗⊃
kavrayıvermek/≗⊃
kaçınabilmek/≗⊃
kercetmek/≗⊃
kestirmek/≗⊃
kirletilebilmek/≗⊃
konaklayabilmek/≗⊃
koşabilmek/≗⊃
kurumlanabilmek/≗⊃
köleleştirmek/≗⊃
köyleşmek/≗⊃
kütürdetmek/≗⊃
kıyabilmek/≗⊃
listeleyebilmek/≗⊃
medenileştirilmek/≗⊃
meşk etmek/≗⊃
muzipleşmek/≗⊃
nakledilmek/≗⊃
netleştirmek/≗⊃
oksitlenmek/≗⊃
ormek/≗≿
parazitlenmek/≗⊃
pekleşmek/≗⊃
pinekletmek/≗⊃
profesyonelleşmek/≗⊃
rasyonelleşmek/≗⊃
ruziklenmek/≗⊃
saklanabilmek/≗⊃
saptırabilmek/≗⊃
saçmalayabilmek/≗⊃
sendeletmek/≗⊃
serpiştirilmek/≗⊃
sessizleştirilmek/≗⊃
seviştirmek/≗⊃
seçkinleştirilmek/≗⊃
silkeleyebilmek/≗⊃
sirkeleştirilmek/≗⊃
sollayabilmek/≗⊃
stop etmek/≗⊃
suyu başından kesmek/≗⊃
söyleyivermek/≗⊃
sünger geçirmek/≗⊃
sürüklenmek/≗⊃
sırtlayabilmek/≗⊃
tabir etmek/≗⊃
takatsizleşmek/≗⊃
tanelenmek/≗⊃
tasarlanabilmek/≗⊃
tazammun etmek/≗⊃
tebriye etmek/≗⊃
teganni etmek/≗⊃
tekâsüf etmek/≗⊃
temeyyüz etmek/≗⊃
tepmek/≗≿
tertip etmek/≗⊃
tevekkül etmek/≗⊃
teşhir etmek/≗⊃
titreyebilmek/≗⊃
tutunuvermek/≗⊃
tümörleşmek/≗⊃
tırmalayabilmek/≗⊃
uydurabilmek/≗⊃
uğurlanabilmek/≗⊃
verilmek/≗⊃
yaklaşıvermek/≗⊃
yapılagelmek/≗⊃
yatak sermek/≗⊃
yedirebilmek/≗⊃
yerelleştirmek/≗⊃
yetkinleştirilmek/≗⊃
yiğitlenmek/≗⊃
yâd etmek/≗⊃
yüklettirmek/≗⊃
yüzsüzleşmek/≗⊃
zenginlenmek/≗⊃
çalabilmek/≗⊃
çatallanabilmek/≗⊃
çekimlenebilmek/≗⊃
çektirmek/≗⊃
çerezlenmek/≗⊃
çeyizlenmek/≗⊃
çingeneleşmek/≗⊃
çizgileşmek/≗⊃
çullanabilmek/≗⊃
çöreklenmek/≗⊃
çıkılabilmek/≗⊃
ödevlendirmek/≗⊃
ölümsüzleştirebilmek/≗⊃
örneklenmek/≗⊃
özendirebilmek/≗⊃
öğrenilmek/≗⊃
ünletmek/≗⊃
ısmarlayabilmek/≗⊃
şekillenebilmek/≗⊃
şirketleştirmek/≗⊃
